West Virginia, session 2025, SB626.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 29. INTERGOVERNMENTAL RELATIONS -- REGIONAL AIRPORTS. §8-29-6. Qualification of members. All members of the board of each authority shall  be residents of the municipality or county which said the members represent: Provided, That a participating municipality or county may appoint a nonresident member 90 days after publishing a notice to fill an initial appointment or vacancy as a Class II legal advertisement in compliance with the provisions of §59-3-1 et seq. of this code. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home